Wisconsin, session 2025, AB953.
do enact as follows:AB953,14Section 1. 175.37 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB953,1,55175.37 (title) Warning Requirements whenever transferring a firearm.AB953,21Section 2. 175.37 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 175.37 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB953,2,53175.37 (1) (intro.) Upon the retail commercial sale or retail commercial 4transfer of any firearm, the seller or transferor shall provide to the buyer or 5transferee all of the following:AB953,2,106(a) A written warning in block letters not less than one-fourth inch in height: 7“IF YOU LEAVE A LOADED FIREARM WITHIN THE REACH OR EASY 8ACCESS OF A CHILD YOU MAY BE FINED OR IMPRISONED OR BOTH IF 9THE CHILD IMPROPERLY DISCHARGES, POSSESSES OR EXHIBITS THE 10FIREARM.”AB953,311Section 3. 175.37 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB953,2,1312175.37 (1) (b) A secure, lockable container that is designed to store a firearm 13or a trigger lock for the firearm.AB953,414Section 4. 175.37 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB953,2,1615175.37 (2) Any person who violates sub. (1) (a) or (b) may be fined not more 16than $500 or imprisoned for not more than 30 days or both.AB953,2,1717